North Dakota, session 69, HB1612.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 15-11 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
North Dakota center for aerospace medicine.
1. The university of North Dakota with the school of medicine and health sciences shall establish
the North Dakota center for aerospace medicine under the John D. Odegard school o f
aerospace sciences.
2. The North Dakota center for aerospace medicine shall:
a. Provide mental health resources and assistance to obtain medical certification from the
federal aviation administration to flight students, pilots, and aviation professionals in the
fields of commercial aviation, unmanned aircraft systems, and air traffic control;
b. Cooperate with the federal aviation administration office of aerospace medicine;
c. Support access, including rural access, to mental health resources, aviation medical
examiners, and human intervention motivational study aviation medical examiners;
d. Provide support to assist aviation medical examiners, human intervention motivational
study aviation medical examiners, and applicants with federal aviation administration
requirements;
e. Facilitate collaboration between research initiatives across the state related to aviation
and space medicine; and
f. Provide mental health education and outreach.
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - UNIVERSITY OF NORTH DAKOTA - NORTH DAKOTA
CENTER FOR AEROSPACE MEDICINE - ONE-TIME FUNDING. There is appropriated out of any
moneys in the community health trust fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of
$250,000, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, and from other funds derived from federal
funds or other sources, the sum of $250,000, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the
university of North Dakota for the purpose of planning, developing, establishing, and operating the
North Dakota center for aerospace medicine, including personnel recruitment and salaries, facility and
assessment material costs, professional development and training, education and outreach, and initial
research funding, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The
appropriation provided in this section is considered a one-time funding item.

H. B. NO. 1612 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1612.
House Vote: Yeas 82 Nays 10 Absent 2
Senate Vote: Yeas 39 Nays 7 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State